California, session 20252026, AB2558.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22303 of the Financial Code is amended to read:22303. Every (a) A licensee who lends any sum of money may less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) shall not contract for and or receive charges at a rate not exceeding the sum of the following: an annual percentage rate set forth in, and calculated pursuant to, the Military Lending Act (10 U.S.C. Sec. 987) and its implementing regulations (32 C.F.R. Part 232) as in effect on January 1, 2026.(a)Two and one-half percent per month on that part of the unpaid principal balance of any loan up to, including, but not in excess of two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225).(b)Two percent per month on that portion of the unpaid principal balance in excess of two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) up to, including, but not in excess of nine hundred dollars ($900).(c)One and one-half percent per month on that part of the unpaid principal balance in excess of nine hundred dollars ($900) up to, including, but not in excess of one thousand six hundred fifty dollars ($1,650).(d)One percent per month on any remainder of such unpaid balance in excess of one thousand six hundred fifty dollars ($1,650).(b) This section does not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22251.SEC. 2. Section 23036 of the Financial Code is amended to read:23036. (a) A fee The total amount charged to a customer for a deferred deposit transaction shall not exceed 15 percent of the face amount of the check. an annual percentage rate set forth in, and calculated pursuant to, the Military Lending Act (10 U.S.C. Sec. 987) and its implementing regulations (32 C.F.R. Part 232) as in effect on January 1, 2026.(b) A licensee may allow an extension of time, or a payment plan, for repayment of an existing deferred deposit transaction but may not charge any additional fee or charge of any kind in conjunction with the extension or payment plan. A licensee that complies with the provisions of this subdivision shall not be deemed to be in violation of subdivision (g) of Section 23037.(c) A licensee shall not enter into an agreement for a deferred deposit transaction with a customer during the period of time that an earlier written agreement for a deferred deposit transaction for the same customer is in effect.(d) A licensee who enters into a deferred deposit transaction agreement, or any assignee of that licensee, shall not be entitled to recover damages for that transaction in any action brought pursuant to, or governed by, Section 1719 of the Civil Code.(e) A fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15) may be charged for the return of a dishonored check by a depositary institution in a deferred deposit transaction. A single fee charged pursuant to this subdivision is the exclusive charge for a dishonored check. No fee may be added for late payment.(f) No amount in excess of the amounts authorized by this section shall be directly or indirectly charged by a licensee pursuant to a deferred deposit transaction.(g) A licensee shall be subject to the provisions of Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.